Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201646-1305
Report required; natural resources
district; duties.

Each natural resources district shall submit electronically an annual report
to the Natural Resources Committee of the Legislature detailing all water
quality programs conducted by the district in the preceding calendar year.
The report shall include the funds received and expended for water quality
projects and a listing of any unfunded projects. The first report shall be
submitted on or before December 1, 2001, and then each December 1 thereafter.

Laws 2001, LB 329, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 57.